Tennessee, session 114, SB1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-142(c), is amended by deleting
"By April 1, 2009, the board of regents, the University of Tennessee, and the Tennessee
Independent Colleges and Universities Association shall provide a report to the Tennessee
higher education commission on the reasonable efforts their institutions have taken to attempt to
deter infringement of copyrighted works over the school's computer and network resources.
Thereafter, if" and substituting "If".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1327
003194
- 1 -